Massachusetts, session 194th, S2900.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 5O the following section:-
Section 5P. A city or town that accepts this section may issue rebates to those taxpayers
who received the residential exemption in the prior fiscal year; provided, however, that the city
or town shall set asset, income or other thresholds to determine eligibility for said rebates. The
city or town shall appropriate an amount to be used for such rebates; and provided further, that
such rebates for each eligible taxpayer shall be in a uniform amount based on the amount
appropriated and the estimated number of eligible taxpayers. The amount of the rebate shall be in
addition to any exemptions allowed under this chapter. A taxpayer who seeks to qualify for the
rebate shall, before the deadline established by city or town, file an application, on a form to be
adopted by the board of assessors, with the supporting documentation of the applicant’s income,
assets and any other information as described in the application. The application shall be filed
each year for which the applicant seeks the rebate.
of 1